Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
SUBPART C
SENTENCING - SPECIAL OFFENDERS

19-2.5-1125. Petitions - special offenders.

Mandatory sentence offender. A juvenile is a mandatory sentence offender if the juvenile:

Has been adjudicated a juvenile delinquent twice; or

Has been adjudicated a juvenile delinquent and if the juvenile's probation has been revoked for a delinquent act, and:

Is subsequently adjudicated a juvenile delinquent; or

Has probation revoked for a delinquent act.

Repeat juvenile offender. A juvenile is a repeat juvenile offender if the juvenile has been previously adjudicated a juvenile delinquent and is adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for a delinquent act that constitutes a felony or if the juvenile's probation
is revoked for a delinquent act that constitutes a felony.

Violent juvenile offender. A juvenile is a violent juvenile offender if the juvenile is adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for a delinquent act that constitutes a crime of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406 (2).

Aggravated juvenile offender.

A juvenile offender is an aggravated juvenile offender if the juvenile is:

Adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for a delinquent act that constitutes a class 1 or class 2 felony or if the juvenile's probation is revoked for a delinquent act that constitutes a class 1 or class 2 felony; or

Adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for a delinquent act that constitutes a felony and either is subsequently adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for a delinquent act that constitutes a crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406 (2), or has probation
revoked for a delinquent act that constitutes a crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406 (2); or

Adjudicated a juvenile delinquent or if the juvenile's probation is revoked for a delinquent act that constitutes felonious unlawful sexual behavior pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 18, incest pursuant to section 18-6-301, or aggravated incest
pursuant to section 18-6-302.

Provisions concerning aggravated juvenile offenders are located in sections 19-2.5-503 and 19-2.5-1127.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 659, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-516 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1126. Sentencing - special offenders.

The court shall sentence a juvenile adjudicated as a special offender as follows:

Mandatory sentence offender. The court shall place or commit a juvenile adjudicated as a mandatory sentence offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (1), out of the home for not less than one year, unless the court finds that an alternative sentence
or a commitment of less than one year out of the home would be more appropriate; except that:

If the person adjudicated as a mandatory sentence offender is eighteen years of age or older on the date of the sentencing hearing, the court may sentence that person to the county jail or to a community correctional facility or program for a period not
to exceed two years, if the person has been adjudicated a mandatory sentence offender pursuant to this article 2.5 for acts committed prior to the person's eighteenth birthday; or

The juvenile or person may be released by the committing judge upon a showing of exemplary behavior.

Repeat juvenile offender. The court shall sentence a juvenile adjudicated as a repeat juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (2), out of the home for not less than one year, unless the court finds that an alternative sentence or a commitment
of less than one year out of the home would be more appropriate; except that:

If the person adjudicated as a repeat juvenile offender is eighteen years of age or older on the date of the sentencing hearing, the court may sentence that person to the county jail or to a community correctional facility or program for a period not
to exceed two years, if the person has been adjudicated a repeat juvenile offender pursuant to this article 2.5 for acts committed prior to the person's eighteenth birthday; or

The juvenile or person may be released by the committing judge upon a showing of exemplary behavior.

Violent juvenile offender. (I) (A) Upon adjudication as a violent juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (3), the juvenile must be placed or committed out of the home for not less than one year; except that this subsection (1)(c) does
not apply to a juvenile who is ten years of age or older, but less than twelve years of age, when the court finds that an alternative sentence or a commitment of less than one year out of the home would be more appropriate.

(B) Upon adjudication as a violent juvenile offender, if the person is eighteen years of age or older on the date of the sentencing hearing, the court may sentence such person to the county jail or to a community correctional facility or program for a
period not to exceed two years, if the person has been adjudicated a violent juvenile offender pursuant to this article 2.5 for acts committed prior to the person's eighteenth birthday.

(II) The court may commit a violent juvenile offender to the department of human services. The court may impose a minimum sentence during which the juvenile must not be released from a residential program without prior written approval of the court that
made the commitment.

Aggravated juvenile offender. The court shall sentence an aggravated juvenile offender as described in section 19-2.5-1127.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 660, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-908 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1127. Aggravated juvenile offender - definition.

Upon adjudication as an aggravated juvenile offender: (1) (a) (I) Upon adjudication as an aggravated juvenile offender:

For an offense other than an offense that would constitute a class 1 or 2 felony if committed by an adult, the court may commit the juvenile to the department of human services for a determinate period of up to five years;

For an offense that would constitute a class 2 felony if committed by an adult, the court shall commit the juvenile to the department of human services for a determinate period of at least three but not more than five years;

For an offense that would constitute a class 1 felony if committed by an adult, the court shall commit the juvenile to the department of human services for a determinate period of at least three but not more than seven years; and

When the petition alleges the offense of murder in the first degree or murder in the second degree, or sexual assault pursuant to section 18-3-402 (3.5) or (4) and the juvenile is adjudicated a delinquent for either murder in the first degree or murder
in the second degree, then the court may sentence the juvenile consecutively or concurrently for any crime of violence as described in section 18-1.3-406 or for a delinquent act contained in the petition
for which the juvenile is an aggravated juvenile offender.

An aggravated juvenile offender thus committed to the department of human services must not be transferred to a nonsecure or community setting for a period of more than forty-eight hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays, nor released
before the expiration of the determinate term imposed by the court without prior order of the court.

Upon court order, the department of human services may transfer a juvenile committed to its custody pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section to the department of corrections if the juvenile has reached eighteen years of age and the department of
human services has certified that the juvenile is no longer benefitting from its programs.

The department of human services shall initiate such transfer by filing a request for transfer with the court of commitment that must state the basis for the request. Upon receipt of such a request, the court shall notify the interested parties and set
the matter for a hearing.

The court shall authorize the transfer only upon a finding by a preponderance of the evidence that the juvenile is no longer benefitting from the programs of the department of human services.

Upon entering an order of transfer to the department of corrections, pursuant to this subsection (1)(b), the court shall amend the mittimus and transfer all further jurisdiction over the juvenile to the department of corrections. Thereafter the juvenile
is governed by the provisions for adult felony offenders in titles 16 and 17 as if the juvenile had been sentenced as an adult felony offender for the unserved portion of sentence that remains upon transfer to the
department of corrections.

After a juvenile who is sentenced pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I)(B) or (1)(a)(I)(C) of this section has been in the custody of the department of human services for three years or more, the department may petition the court for an order authorizing the
department to place the juvenile on juvenile parole upon approval by the juvenile parole board pursuant to section 19-2.5-1203. After a juvenile who is sentenced pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I)(A) of this section has served
the minimum mandatory period of the commitment or three years, whichever is sooner, the department of human services may petition the court for an order authorizing the department to place the juvenile on juvenile parole
upon approval by the juvenile parole board pursuant to section 19-2.5-1203. The department of human services shall conduct the parole supervision. Upon filing the petition, the court shall notify the interested parties
and set the matter for a hearing. The court shall authorize the department of human services to place the juvenile on juvenile parole upon approval of the juvenile parole board pursuant to section 19-2.5-1203, only upon
finding by a preponderance of the evidence that the safety of the community will not be jeopardized by the juvenile's release.

Parole supervision of a juvenile who has been transferred to the department of corrections is governed by the provisions for adult felony offenders in titles 16, 17, and 18 as if the juvenile had been sentenced as an adult felony offender; except that,
if the juvenile was adjudicated and sentenced for a class 1 felony, then the juvenile must serve a ten-year period of mandatory parole after completion of the juvenile's sentence.

Upon filing a petition with the committing court for transfer of the juvenile to a nonsecure or community setting, or for early release from the custody of the department of corrections or human services, the court shall notify the interested parties
and set the matter for a hearing. The court shall order such transfer or release only upon a finding by a preponderance of the evidence that the safety of the community will not be jeopardized by the transfer or release; except
that early release of the juvenile from the department of corrections is governed by the provisions for adult felony offenders in titles 16 and 17 as if the juvenile had been sentenced as an adult felony offender.

When a juvenile in the custody of the department of human services pursuant to this section reaches the age of twenty years and six months, the department of human services shall file a motion with the court of commitment regarding further jurisdiction
of the juvenile. Upon the filing of such a motion, the court shall notify the interested parties, appoint counsel for the juvenile, and set the matter for a hearing. The court shall, as part of this hearing, reconsider
the length of the remaining sentence and consider the factors as set forth in subsection (4)(c) of this section. (4) (a) (I) When a juvenile in the custody of the department of human services pursuant to this section
reaches the age of twenty years and six months, the department of human services shall file a motion with the court of commitment regarding further jurisdiction of the juvenile. Upon the filing of such a motion,
the court shall notify the interested parties, appoint counsel for the juvenile, and set the matter for a hearing. The court shall, as part of this hearing, reconsider the length of the remaining sentence and consider
the factors as set forth in subsection (4)(c) of this section.

When the court notifies the interested parties, the court shall order that the juvenile submit to and cooperate with a psychological evaluation and risk assessment by a mental health professional to determine whether the juvenile is a danger either to
himself or herself or to others. The mental health professional shall prepare a written report and provide a copy of the report to the court that ordered it, the prosecuting attorney, and counsel for the juvenile
at least fourteen days before the hearing.

At the hearing upon the motion, the court may either transfer the custody of and jurisdiction over the juvenile to the department of corrections for placement in a correctional facility, the youthful offender system, or a community corrections program;
authorize early release of the juvenile pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; place the juvenile on adult parole for a period of five years; or order that custody and jurisdiction over the juvenile must remain with
the department of human services; except that the custody of and jurisdiction over the juvenile by the department of human services terminates when the juvenile reaches twenty-one years of age.

In considering whether to transfer the custody of and jurisdiction over the juvenile to the department of corrections, the court shall consider all relevant factors including, but not limited to, the court-ordered psychological evaluation and risk assessment;
the nature of the crimes committed; the offender's prior criminal history; the offender's maturity; the offender's behavior in custody; the offender's progress and participation in classes, programs, and educational improvement;
the impact of the crimes on the victims; the likelihood of rehabilitation; the placement where the offender is most likely to succeed in reintegrating in the community; and the interest of the community in the imposition
of punishment commensurate with the gravity of the offense.

At any postadjudication hearing held pursuant to this section, the state is represented by the district attorney and the attorney general; except that the attorney general may be excused from participation in the hearing with the permission of the district
attorney and of the court. At any postadjudication hearing held pursuant to this section, the department of corrections is considered an interested party and must be sent notice of such hearing.

As used in this section, "mental health professional" means a person who is employed by the department of human services or is employed under contract with the department of human services and is:

A licensed physician with the appropriate training and expertise in psychiatry; or

A licensed psychologist.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 661, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-601 (5) to (10) as it existed prior to 2021.